New York, session 2025-2026, A3031.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision (a) of section 1210 of the vehicle and traffic 2 law, as amended by chapter 350 of the laws of 1967, is amended to read 3 as follows: 4 (a) No person driving or in charge of a motor vehicle shall permit it 5 to stand unattended without first stopping the engine, locking the 6 ignition, removing the key from the vehicle, and effectively setting the 7 brake thereon and, when standing upon any grade, turning the front 8 wheels to the curb or side of the highway, provided, however, the 9 provision for removing the key from the vehicle shall not require the 10 removal of keys hidden from sight about the vehicle for convenience or 11 emergency. There shall be an exception from the requirement of stopping 12 the engine when a person driving or in charge of a motor vehicle is 13 allowing such vehicle to stand unattended if such person is using a 14 remote car starter to turn the engine on while away from the vehicle for 15 the purposes of engaging such vehicle's climate controls. 16 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04383-01-5